Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-601
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-601 to 48-683 shall be known and may be cited as the Employment Security Law.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 1, p. 370;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 14, p. 401;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-701;

R.S.1943, § 48-601;

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 1, p. 417;

Laws 1953, c. 167, § 1, p. 520;

Laws 1981, LB 470, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 343, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1337, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1072, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 192, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 484, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 739, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB1020, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB961, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 4.

Appeals to the Supreme Court under the provisions of the Employment Security Law are reviewed de novo on the record. Smith v. Sorensen, 222 Neb. 599, 386 N.W.2d 5 (1986).

The Employment Security Law provides one avenue of judicial appeal when the dispute concerns benefit liability and another when the dispute concerns contribution liability. Northern Messenger v. Sorensen, 218 Neb. 846, 359 N.W.2d 787 (1984).

The state, by its Legislature, has extensively entered the field of labor. Midwest Employers Council, Inc. v. City of Omaha, 177 Neb. 877, 131 N.W.2d 609 (1964).

A compensable claim for benefits under the unemployment compensation act must have some relation to, or connection with, the employment which employee has lost. Woodmen of the World Life Ins. Soc. v. Olsen, 141 Neb. 776, 4 N.W.2d 923 (1942).